Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.020

Rules and regulations as to use—Penalty.

Any board of county commissioners may make such rules and regulations as may be deemed necessary for the use and occupation of such sites, and may provide for the maintenance and care thereof. Any person violating any of the rules and regulations made by the board relating to the use or occupation of any site owned or occupied by the county for garbage disposal purposes shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.58.020. Prior: 1943 c 87 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6294-151.]